Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.240

Benefits not transferable or subject to legal process—Exceptions—Chapter not exclusive.

The right of any person to any future payment under the provisions of this chapter shall not be transferable or assignable at law or in equity, and none of the moneys paid or payable or the rights existing under this chapter, shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment, or other legal process, or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law. This section shall not be applicable to any child support collection action taken under chapter 26.18, 26.23, or 74.20A RCW. Benefits under this chapter shall be payable to a spouse or ex-spouse to the extent expressly provided for in any court decree of dissolution or legal separation or in any court order or court-approved property settlement agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or legal separation.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deprive any participant, eligible to receive a pension hereunder, from receiving a pension under any other act to which that participant may become eligible by reason of services other than or in addition to his or her services under this chapter.

[ 1995 c 11 s 13. Prior: 1989 c 360 s 26; 1989 c 91 s 21; 1979 ex.s. c 205 s 3; 1957 c 159 s 6; 1945 c 261 s 24; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9578-38.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 91: See note following RCW 41.24.010.